Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska90-279
Game and Parks Commission; convey
property to Lower Loup Natural Resources District.

The Game and Parks Commission is authorized
to convey to the Lower Loup Natural Resources District for public purposes
the following described real estate, now known as Pibel Lake State Recreation
Area, situated in the county of Wheeler, in the State of Nebraska, to wit:
A tract of land in the southeast quarter of section 25, township 21 north,
range 11 west of the 6th principal meridian, Wheeler County, Nebraska, more
fully described as follows: Commencing at the southeast corner of section
25, township 21 north, range 11 west of the 6th principal meridian, (the east
side of said section having an assumed bearing of north 0 degrees, 00 minutes
east and the south side of said section an assumed bearing of south 89 degrees,
25 minutes west); thence south 89 degrees, 25 minutes west a distance of 440
feet to the point of beginning; thence south 89 degrees, 25 minutes west a
distance of 1409.85 feet; thence north 0 degrees, 53 minutes east a distance
of 890.25 feet; thence north 89 degrees, 25 minutes east a distance of 396
feet; thence north 0 degrees, 00 minutes east a distance of 160 feet; thence
north 89 degrees, 25 minutes east a distance of 160 feet; thence north 0 degrees,
00 minutes east a distance of 930 feet; thence south 89 degrees, 25 minutes
west a distance of 480 feet; thence north 9 degrees, 18 minutes west a distance
of 367.51 feet; thence south 79 degrees, 13 minutes east a distance of 1017.65
feet; thence south 42 degrees, 54 minutes east a distance of 220 feet; thence
south 17 degrees, 13 minutes east a distance of 580.15 feet; thence south
0 degrees, 58 minutes west a distance of 586.0 feet; thence south 37 degrees,
44 minutes east a distance of 111.0 feet; thence south 0 degrees, 00 minutes
west a distance of 750 feet to the point of beginning; excepting lots 49,
50, 77 and 78 in the plat of Pibel Lake, a total of 53.4 acres.

Laws 2012, LB849, § 1.